Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-202
Rules; copies; distribution; posting.

The Jail Standards Board shall cause a copy of the rules to be delivered to the mayor or chief officer of the municipalities, and it shall be the duty of such mayor or other chief officer to cause a copy of the same to be furnished to the person in charge of the prison or jail, to file a copy with the clerk of the municipality, and to further cause a copy to be conspicuously posted in the prison or jail.

Laws 1915, c. 208, § 2, p. 462;

C.S.1922, § 3011;

C.S.1929, § 47-116;

R.S.1943, § 47-202;

Laws 1996, LB 233, § 13.